Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2288.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5114YH (1) 91 ak/ko H.F. 2288 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 139A.8C Vaccination requirements ââ 1 clinical rotations. 2 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 3 requires: 4 a. âClinical rotationâ means a period of training completed 5 for academic credit by a student in a medical, nursing, or 6 other health care-related degree that is supervised by a health 7 care professional in a facility. For the purposes of this 8 paragraph, âfacilityâ means the same as defined in section 9 514J.102. 10 b. âPostsecondary schoolâ means the same as defined in 11 section 139A.8B. 12 2. a. A postsecondary school offering a degree program 13 requiring a clinical rotation shall, upon request of a student 14 enrolled in the degree program, identify a clinical rotation 15 placement where the student will be permitted an exemption from 16 any vaccination requirements imposed by the placement location 17 during the duration of the studentâs clinical rotation. 18 b. A postsecondary school not in compliance with paragraph 19 âaâ shall not qualify as an eligible institution for the 20 purposes of Iowa tuition grants under section 256.191. 21 Sec. 2. Section 256.183, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 22 to read as follows: 23 3. âEligible institutionâ means an institution of higher 24 learning located in Iowa which is operated privately and 25 not controlled or administered by any state agency or any 26 subdivision of the state, which is not exempt from taxation 27 under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and which 28 meets all of the criteria in subsection 1 , paragraphs âdâ 29 through âkâ , and or is a school of barbering and cosmetology 30 arts and sciences licensed under chapter 157 and is accredited 31 by a national accrediting agency recognized by the United 32 States department of education. For the fiscal year beginning 33 July 1, 2017, such a school of barbering and cosmetology arts 34 and sciences shall provide a matching aggregate amount of 35 -1- LSB 5114YH (1) 91 ak/ko 1/ 2 H.F. 2288 institutional financial aid equal to at least seventy-five 1 percent of the amount received by the institutionâs students 2 for Iowa tuition grant assistance under section 256.191 . For 3 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2018, the school of barbering 4 and cosmetology arts and sciences shall provide a matching 5 aggregate amount of institutional financial aid equal to at 6 least eighty-five percent of the amount received in that fiscal 7 year. Commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2019, 8 and each succeeding fiscal year, the matching aggregate amount 9 of institutional financial aid shall be at least equal to the 10 match provided by eligible institutions under section 261.9, 11 subsection 3 , paragraph âaâ , Code 2023. 12